Virginia statutes. Title 20. Domestic Relations.
Chapter 5. Desertion and Nonsupport.
§ 20-79.2. Immediate income deduction; income withholding.

For the purposes of this section, the terms "employer" and "income" shall have the same meanings ascribed to them in § 63.2-1900.

Every initial order entered on or after July 1, 1995, directing a person to pay child support shall include a provision for immediate withholding from the income of the obligor for the amount of the support order, plus an amount for the liquidation of arrearages, if any, unless the obligor and either the obligee or the Department on behalf of the obligee, agree in writing to an alternative payment arrangement or one of the parties demonstrates and the court finds good cause for not imposing immediate withholding. In determining whether good cause is shown, the court shall consider the obligor's past financial responsibility, history of prior payment under any support order, and any other matter that the court considers relevant to the likelihood of payment in accordance with the support order. An alternative payment arrangement may include but is not limited to, a voluntary income assignment pursuant to § 20-79.1 or 63.2-1945.

An order that modifies an initial order may include a provision for immediate income withholding.

The total amount withheld shall not exceed the maximum amount permitted under § 34-29.

A withholding order issued to an obligor's employer pursuant to this section shall conform to § 20-79.3. The rights and obligations of the employer with respect to the order are set out in § 20-79.3. The order shall direct the employer to forward payments to the Department for recording and disbursement to the obligee, or as otherwise required by law. The Department shall not charge a fee for recording and disbursing payments when it is providing support enforcement services to the obligee pursuant to § 63.2-1904 or 63.2-1908.

(1988, c. 906; 1990, cc. 836, 896; 1991, c. 534; 1995, c. 714; 1998, c. 727; 2020, c. 722.)

Cross references.

- As to priority of orders to withhold and deliver property incident to support orders, see
§
63.2-1929.

Editor's note.

- Effective October 1, 2002, the references to former Title 63.1 were substituted with references to Title 63.2 to conform with the recodification of Title 63.1 by Acts
2002, c. 747.

Acts 2020, c. 722, cl. 3 provides: "That nothing in this act shall be construed to define or redefine 'independent contractor' under the common law or for any purpose other than the withholding of income of an independent contractor for the payment of a support obligation."

The 2020 amendments.

- The 2020 amendment by c. 722 inserted subsection A and redesignated the rest as subsection B; in subsection B, substituted "that" for "which" and made stylistic changes.

Applied

in Cass v. Lassiter, 2 Va. App. 273, 343 S.E.2d 470 (1986).

§ 20-79.3. Information required in income deduction order.

For the purposes of this section, the terms "employee," "employer," "income," and "independent contractor" shall have the same meanings ascribed to them in § 63.2-1900.

Orders for withholding from the income of an employee or independent contractor shall state and include the following:

The name and correct social security number of the obligor and the name and correct address of the payee;

That the employer shall withhold and pay out of the disposable income as defined in § 63.2-100, a single monetary amount or the maximum amount permitted under § 34-29, whichever is less, for each regular pay period of the obligor and such payment may be by check. If the employee is an independent contractor, then the order shall state that the employer shall withhold and pay out of the obligor's income a single monetary amount or the maximum amount permitted under § 34-29, whichever is less, for each instance of compensation of the obligor, once the aggregate amount of remuneration reaches $600 or more in a calendar year, and such payment may be by check;

That the income deduction shall begin with the next regular pay period of the obligor following service of the order on the employer, and payment shall be made at regular intervals consistent with the pay periods of the obligor, or, if the obligor is an independent contractor, the order shall begin with the next instance of compensation of the obligor, and payment shall be made at each instance of compensation of the obligor;

A statement of the maximum percentage under § 34-29 that may be withheld from the obligor's disposable income;

That, to the extent required by the provisions for health care coverage contained in the order, the employer shall (i) enroll the employee, the employee's spouse or former spouse, and the employee's dependent children listed in the order as covered persons in a group health insurance plan or other similar plan providing health care services or coverage offered by the employer, without regard to enrollment season restrictions, if the subject spouse, former spouse, or children are eligible for such coverage under the employer's enrollment provisions and (ii) deduct any required premiums from the employee's income to pay for the insurance. If more than one plan is offered by the employer, the spouse, former spouse, or children shall be enrolled prospectively in the insurance plan in which the employee is enrolled or, if the employee is not enrolled, in the least costly plan otherwise available. The employer shall also enroll the children of an employee in the appropriate health coverage plan upon application by the children's other parent or legal guardian or upon application by the Department of Medical Assistance Services. In each case that is being enforced by the Department of Social Services, the employer shall respond to such orders by advising the Department in which plan the children are enrolled or if the children are ineligible for any plan through the employer. The order to the employer shall specify either support withholdings or insurance premium deductions as having priority for the duration of the order in the event the maximum total deduction permitted at any time by § 34-29 is insufficient to fully cover both; the employer shall consider and direct insurance premium deductions and support withholdings the same for purposes of § 34-29. The employer shall not be held liable for any medical expenses incurred on behalf of the spouse, former spouse, or dependent children because of the employer's failure to enroll the spouse, former spouse, or dependent children in a health care plan after being directed to do so by a court or the Department. The employer shall not be obligated to subsequently make or change such enrollment if the group health insurance plan or other factors change after the spouse's, former spouse's, or child's eligibility or ineligibility for coverage is initially determined in response to the order for withholding. However, the employer shall not disenroll such children unless the employer (i) is provided satisfactory written evidence that such court or administrative order is no longer in effect, (ii) is provided satisfactory written evidence that the children are or will be enrolled in a comparable health coverage plan that will take effect not later than the effective date of such disenrollment, or (iii) has eliminated family health coverage for all of its employees. A one-time fee of no more than $5 may be charged by the employer to the employee for the administration of this requirement;

That a fee of $5 for each reply or remittance on account of the obligor may be charged by the employer and withheld from the obligor's income in addition to the support amount to be withheld; however, child support withholding amounts collected from unemployment insurance benefits shall not be subject to this fee;

That the order is binding upon the employer and obligor and withholding is to continue until further notice by order of the court or the Department is served, or the obligor is no longer employed, whichever occurs first;

That the order shall have priority over any other types of liens created by state law against such income, except that if there is more than one court or administrative order for withholding for support against an obligor, the employer shall prorate among the orders based upon the current amounts due pursuant to more than one judicial or administrative order or a combination thereof, with any remaining amounts prorated among the accrued arrearages, if any, to the extent that the amounts withheld, when combined, do not exceed the maximum limits imposed under § 34-29 as specified in the order being honored;

That the obligor's rights are protected pursuant to § 63.2-1944 and that no employer shall discharge any employee, take disciplinary action against an employee, or terminate a contract with or refuse to employ a person by reason of the fact that his income has been made subject to a deduction pursuant to Chapter 19 (§ 63.2-1900 et seq.) of Title 63.2 or § 20-79.1 or 20-79.2 and an employer who discharges or takes disciplinary action against an employee or terminates a contract with or refuses to employ any person because of an order for withholding under these sections shall be liable for a civil fine of not more than $1,000;

The address to which the withholding is to be sent at the Department of Social Services and the case number, if available;

That the employer shall be liable for payments that he fails to withhold or mail as specified in the order;

That employers shall remit payments on each regular pay date of the obligor, or instance of compensation if the obligor is an independent contractor, or, if electronic funds transfer is used, within four days of the pay date, directly to the Division of Child Support Enforcement for disbursement. All employers with at least 100 employees and all payroll processing firms with at least 50 clients shall remit payments by electronic funds transfer;

That the employer shall be deemed to have complied with the order by (i) mailing on each regular pay date of the obligor, or instance of compensation if the obligor is an independent contractor, to the Department, by first-class mail, any amount required to be deducted or (ii) submitting such amounts by electronic funds transfer transmitted within four days of the obligor's regular pay date or instance of compensation;

That the employer and obligor shall notify the Department promptly when the obligor terminates employment and shall provide the last known address of the obligor and name and address of the new employer, if known;

That amounts withheld from multiple employees identified as such by (i) amount, (ii) name, (iii) social security number, (iv) case number if provided in the order, and (v) date payment was withheld from obligor's income may be combined into a single payment when payable to the same payee;

No order or directive shall require employers of 10,000 or more employees to make payments other than by combined single payment to the Department's central office in Richmond, without the employer's express written consent, unless the order is from a support enforcement agency outside the Commonwealth;

Payment pursuant to an order issued under this section shall serve as full acquittance of the employer under any contract of employment;

Notice that any employer who fails to timely withhold payments pursuant to this section shall be liable for any amount not timely withheld;

That the employer shall provide to the employee or independent contractor a copy of the withholding order and the notice to the employee sent by the court.

If the employer receives an order that (i) does not contain the obligor's correct social security number, (ii) does not specify a single monetary amount to be withheld per regular pay period interval of the obligor, unless the obligor is an independent contractor or the order is for lump sum withholding, (iii) does not state the maximum percentage that may be withheld pursuant to § 34-29, (iv) contains information that is in conflict with the employer's current payroll records, or (v) orders payment to an entity other than to the Department of Social Services or the Department's designee, the employer may deposit in the mail or otherwise file a reply to that effect within five business days from service of such order. The order shall be void from transmission or filing of such reply unless the court or the Department, as applicable, finds that the reply is materially false. In addition, an employer of 10,000 or more persons may also file a reply, with like effect, if payment is ordered other than by combined single payment in the case of withholdings from multiple employees to the Department's central office in Richmond, without the employer's express written consent, unless the order is from a support enforcement agency outside the Commonwealth.

(1990, c. 896; 1991, cc. 651, 694; 1994, c. 767; 1996, c. 416; 1998, c. 727; 2001, c. 209; 2006, c. 365; 2007, c. 557; 2020, c. 722.)

Cross references.

- As to failure to comply with support obligation, see
§
16.1-278.16.

As to authority of the Department of Social Services, in the absence of a court order, to direct the payment of child and child and spousal support, and under certain circumstances health care coverage, including requirements specified for employers pursuant to
§
20-79.3 A 5, see

§

63.2-1903.

As to issuance of an administrative order for withholding of income incident to a support order, see
§§
63.2-1923, 63.2-1924. As to issuance to an employer for withholding pursuant to a support order, see

§

63.2-1929.

For requirement that assignment of earnings to satisfy a support debt be honored when ordered by the Commissioner of Social Services by a payroll deduction order conforming to
§
20-79.3, see

§

63.2-1945.

Editor's note.

- Acts 2020, c. 722, cl. 3 provides: "That nothing in this act shall be construed to define or redefine 'independent contractor' under the common law or for any purpose other than the withholding of income of an independent contractor for the payment of a support obligation."

The 2001 amendments.

- The 2001 amendment by c. 209 inserted "however, child support withholding amounts collected from unemployment insurance benefits shall not be subject to this fee" at the end of subdivision A 6.

The 2006 amendments.

- The 2006 amendment by c. 365, effective March 30, 2006, substituted "prorate among the orders ... accrued arrearages, if any" for "honor the terms of the earliest received order, and subsequent orders shall be honored in the order of receipt" in subdivision A 8.

The 2007 amendments.

- The 2007 amendment by c. 557 deleted "
§
" preceding "20-79.2" in subdivision A 9; and added the last sentence in subdivision A 12.

The 2020 amendments.

- The 2020 amendment by c. 722 inserted subsection A; designated the following paragraph with its of subdivisions 1 through 19 as subsection B, with the subdivision becoming subdivisions B 1 through B 19; redesignated subsection B as subsection C; in subdivision B 2, inserted "such" in the first sentence and substituted "If the employee is an independent contractor, then the order shall state that the employer shall withhold and pay out of the obligor's income a single monetary amount or the maximum amount permitted under
§
34-29, whichever is less, for each instance of compensation of the obligor, once the aggregate amount of remuneration reaches $600 or more in a calendar year, and such payment may be by check" for "The terms 'employer' and 'income' shall have the meanings prescribed in

§

63.2-1900" in the second sentence; in subdivision B 3, added "or, if the obligor is an independent contractor, the order shall begin with the next instance of compensation of the obligor, and payment shall be made at each instance of compensation of the obligor"; in subdivision B 4 and B 11, substituted "that" for "which"; in subdivision B 5, substituted "case that" for "case which" in the fourth sentence and substituted "plan that" for "plan which" in the penultimate sentence in clause (ii); in subdivision B 9, inserted "terminate a contract with or" and "terminates a contract with or"; in subdivision B 12, inserted "or instance of compensation if the obligor is an independent contractor"; in subdivision B 13, inserted "or instance of compensation if the obligor is an independent contractor" in clause (i), deleted "by" preceding "submitting" in clause (ii), and added "or instance of compensation" at the end of clause (ii); in subdivision B 19, inserted "or independent contractor"; in subsection C in the first sentence, inserted "unless the obligor is an independent contractor or the order is for lump sum withholding" in clause (ii) and substituted "that" for "which" in clauses (iii) and (iv) and made stylistic changes.

Law review.

- For 2006 survey article, "Family and Juvenile Law," see 41 U. Rich. L. Rev. 151 (2006).

For 2007 annual survey article, "Labor and Employment Law," see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 489 (2007).

Michie's Jurisprudence.

- For related discussion, see 14A M.J. Parent and Child,
§
4.

§ 20-80. Violation of orders; trial; forfeiture of recognizance.

If at any time the court may be satisfied by information and due proof that the defendant has violated the terms of such order, it may forthwith proceed with the trial of the defendant under the original charge, or sentence him or her, under the original conviction, or annul suspension of sentence, and enforce such sentence, or in its discretion may extend or renew the term of probation as the case may be. Upon due proof that the terms of such order have been violated, the court shall in any event have the power to declare the recognizance forfeited, the sum or sums thereon to be paid, in the discretion of the court, in whole or in part to the defendant's spouse, or to the guardian, curator, custodian or trustee of the minor child or children, or to an organization or individual designated by the court to receive the same.

(Code 1919, § 1940; 1918, p. 761; 1922, p. 846; 1974, c. 464.)

Applied

in Jones v. Robinson, 229 Va. 276, 329 S.E.2d 794 (1985).

§ 20-81. Presumptions as to desertion and abandonment.

Proof of desertion or of neglect of spouse, child or children by any person shall be prima facie evidence that such desertion or neglect is willful; and proof that a person has left his or her spouse, or his or her child or children in destitute or necessitous circumstances, or has contributed nothing to their support for a period of thirty days prior or subsequent either or both to his or her departure, shall constitute prima facie evidence of an intention to abandon such family.

(Code 1919, § 1941; 1918, p. 761; 1922, p. 846; 1974, c. 464.)

§ 20-82. Spouses competent as witnesses.

In every prosecution under this chapter, persons married to each other shall be competent witnesses to testify against each other in all relevant matters, including the facts of such marriage, provided that neither shall be compelled to give evidence incriminating himself.

(Code 1919, § 1941; 1918, p. 761; 1922, p. 846; 2020, c. 900.)

The 2020 amendments.

- The 2020 amendment by c. 900 substituted "under this chapter, persons married to each other" for "under this chapter both husband and wife" and at the end deleted "or herself."

Law review.

- For an overview of Virginia Supreme Court decisions on domestic relations, see 15 U. Rich. L. Rev. 321 (1981).

§ 20-83. Venue of offense.

Any offense under this chapter shall be held to have been committed in any county or city in which such spouse, child or children may be at the time of desertion, or in which such child or children may be or remain, with the knowledge and acquiescence of the accused, in destitute or necessitous condition, or where the accused shall be found in this Commonwealth.

(Code 1919, § 1942; 1918, p. 761; 1922, p. 846; 1975, c. 644.)

Applied

in Jones v. Robinson, 229 Va. 276, 329 S.E.2d 794 (1985).

§ 20-83.1. Transfer of cases between courts in certain instances.

In the event that a spouse or dependent child has left the jurisdiction of the court in which the original petition was filed, but is still within the Commonwealth, and the accused is not within the jurisdiction embraced by such court, on motion of the spouse or child, or accused or the person having custody of such child, the court in which the original petition was filed may transfer the case to the court having original jurisdiction to hear such petitions in the county or city in this Commonwealth in which the spouse or child or accused resides. The court to which such case has been transferred shall have power to enforce such orders and decrees as may have been made in the court transferring the case as though the petition had been originally filed therein, and to make such other orders and decrees as may be necessary to enforce the provisions of this chapter.

In the event that an appeal is pending in a court of record in this Commonwealth from the decision of any court having jurisdiction to hear such petitions, upon motion of the spouse or child, or the person having custody of the child, stating that such spouse or child no longer resides within the jurisdiction of such court of record, such court, upon reaching its decision, may transfer the case to the court having original jurisdiction to hear such petitions in the county or city in which the spouse or child resides in the same manner and to the same effect as provided in subsection (a) hereof.

(1964, c. 12; 1974, c. 464.)

§ 20-84. Extradition.

Whenever the judge of, or magistrate serving, the jurisdiction wherein such offense is alleged to have been committed shall, after an investigation of the facts and circumstances thereof, certify that in his opinion the charge is well founded and the case a proper one for extradition, or in any case if the cost of extradition is borne by the parties interested in the case, the person charged with having left the Commonwealth with the intention of evading the terms of his or her probation or of abandoning or deserting his or her spouse, or his or her child or children, or failing to support them, shall be apprehended and brought back to the county or city having jurisdiction of the case in accordance with the law providing for the apprehension and return to the Commonwealth of fugitives from justice, and upon conviction punished as hereinabove provided.

(Code 1919, § 1942; 1918, p. 761; 1922, p. 846; 1974, c. 464; 2008, cc. 551, 691.)

The 2008 amendments.

- The 2008 amendments by cc. 551 and 691 are identical and substituted "judge of, or magistrate serving, the jurisdiction wherein such offense" for "judge or magistrate within whose jurisdiction such offense" near the beginning.

Michie's Jurisprudence.

- For related discussion, see 8A M.J. Extradition,
§
2.

§§ 20-85, 20-86.

Repealed by Acts 1988, c. 495.

§ 20-87. Arrest for violating directions, rules or regulations given by judge.

Whenever the chief of police or sheriff becomes satisfied that such person is violating the directions, rules or regulations given or prescribed by the judge for his or her conduct, such chief of police or sheriff shall have authority to arrest such person after a proper capias or warrant has been issued for such person and forthwith carry him before the court before whom he or she was first brought.

(Code 1919, § 1944; 1918, p. 762; 1922, p. 847; 1974, c. 464; 1975, c. 644; 1988, c. 495.)

§ 20-87.1.

Repealed by Acts 2003, c. 467.

Cross references.

- For authority of Department of Social Services to obtain information from other state agencies, public service corporations and companies to assist in locating parents who have deserted their children, see
§
63.2-1902.

§ 20-88. Support of parents by children.

It shall be the joint and several duty of all persons eighteen years of age or over, of sufficient earning capacity or income, after reasonably providing for his or her own immediate family, to assist in providing for the support and maintenance of his or her mother or father, he or she being then and there in necessitous circumstances.

If there be more than one person bound to support the same parent or parents, the persons so bound to support shall jointly and severally share equitably in the discharge of such duty. Taking into consideration the needs of the parent or parents and the circumstances affecting the ability of each person to discharge the duty of support, the court having jurisdiction shall have the power to determine and order the payment, by such person or persons so bound to support, of that amount for support and maintenance which to the court may seem just. Where the court ascertains that any person has failed to render his or her proper share in such support and maintenance it may, upon the complaint of any party or on its own motion, compel contribution by that person to any person or authority which has theretofore contributed to the support or maintenance of the parent or parents. The court may from time to time revise the orders entered by it or by any other court having jurisdiction under the provisions of this section, in such manner as to it may seem just.

The juvenile and domestic relations district court shall have exclusive original jurisdiction in all cases arising under this section. Any person aggrieved shall have the same right of appeal as is provided by law in other cases.

All proceedings under this section shall conform as nearly as possible to the proceedings under the other provisions of this chapter, and the other provisions of this chapter shall apply to cases arising under this section in like manner as though they were incorporated in this section. Prosecutions under this section shall be in the jurisdiction where the parent or parents reside.

This section shall not apply if there is substantial evidence of desertion, neglect, abuse or willful failure to support any such child by the father or mother, as the case may be, prior to the child's emancipation or, except as provided hereafter in this section, if a parent is otherwise eligible for and is receiving public assistance or services under a federal or state program.

To the extent that the financial responsibility of children for any part of the costs incurred in providing medical assistance to their parents pursuant to the plan provided for in § 32.1-325 is not restricted by that plan and to the extent that the financial responsibility of children for any part of the costs incurred in providing to their parents services rendered, administered or funded by the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services is not restricted by federal law, the provisions of this section shall apply. A proceeding may be instituted in accordance with this section in the name of the Commonwealth by the state agency administering the program of assistance or services in order to compel any child of a parent receiving such assistance or services to reimburse the Commonwealth for such portion of the costs incurred in providing the assistance or services as the court may determine to be reasonable. If costs are incurred for the institutionalization of a parent, the children shall in no case be responsible for such costs for more than sixty months of institutionalization.

Any person violating the provisions of an order entered pursuant to this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and on conviction thereof shall be punished by a fine not exceeding $500 or imprisonment in jail for a period not exceeding twelve months or both.

(1920, p. 413; 1922, p. 544; 1928, p. 745; 1942, p. 406; Michie Code 1942, § 1944a; 1952, c. 510; 1954, c. 481; 1962, c. 557; 1968, c. 665; 1970, c. 278; 1974, c. 657; 1975, c. 644; 1982, c. 472; 1984, c. 781; 2009, cc. 813, 840.)

Cross references.

- As to punishment for conviction of a misdemeanor, see
§
18.2-11.

Editor's note.

- Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 2, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 4, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, "if state funds are provided, including all local costs, to carry out the purposes of this bill by the General Assembly." The funding was not provided.

The 2009 amendments.

- The 2009 amendments by cc. 813 and 840 are identical and substituted "Behavioral Health and Developmental" for "Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse" in the sixth paragraph.

Law review.

- For survey of the Virginia law on domestic relations for the year 1967-1968, see 54 Va. L. Rev. 1215 (1968). For article on paying the medical bills of elderly parents, see 19 U. Rich. L. Rev. 69 (1984).

For survey, "Grow Up Virginia: Time to Change Our Filial Responsibility Law," see 51 U. Rich. L. Rev. 265 (2016).

Michie's Jurisprudence.

- For related discussion, see 14A M.J. Parent and Child,
§
24.

§ 20-88.01.

Repealed by Acts 1992, c. 662.

Cross references.

- For present provisions relating to transfer of assets to qualify for assistance and liability of transferees, see
§
20-88.02.

§ 20-88.02. Transfer of assets to qualify for assistance; liability of transferees.

As used in this section,

"uncompensated value"

means the aggregate amount by which the fair market value of all property or resources, including fractional interests, transferred by any transferor after the effective date of and subject to this section, exceeds the aggregate consideration received for such property or resources.

Within thirty months prior to the date on which any person receives benefits from any program of public assistance or social services as defined in § 63.2-100, if such person has transferred any property or resources resulting in uncompensated value, the transferee of such property or resources shall be liable to repay the Commonwealth for benefits paid on behalf of the transferor up to the amount of that uncompensated value less $25,000.

In their discretion, the heads of the agencies which administer the appropriate program or programs of public assistance may petition the circuit court having jurisdiction over the property or over the transferee for an order requiring repayment. That order shall continue in effect, as the court may determine, for so long as the transferor receives public assistance or until the uncompensated value is completely repaid. With respect to all transfers subject to this section, a rebuttable presumption is created that the transferee acted with the intent and for the purpose of assisting the transferor to qualify for public assistance. If the presumption is rebutted, this section shall not apply and the petition shall be dismissed.

After reasonable investigation, the agency or agencies administering the program of public assistance shall not file any petition, and no court shall order payments under subsection B of this section if it is determined that: (i) the uncompensated value of the property transferred is $25,000 or less, (ii) that the property transferred was the home of the transferor at the time of the transfer and the transferor or any of the following individuals reside in the home: the transferor's spouse, any natural or adopted child of the transferor under the age of twenty-one years or any natural or adopted child of the transferor, regardless of age, who is blind or disabled as defined by the federal Social Security Act or the Virginia Medicaid Program, or (iii) the transferee is without financial means or that such payment would work a hardship on the transferee or his family. If the transferee does not fully cooperate with the investigating agency to determine the nature and extent of the hardship, there shall be a rebuttable presumption that no hardship exists.

(1992, c. 662; 2002, c. 747.)

The 2002 amendments.

- The 2002 amendment by c. 747, effective October 1, 2002, substituted "or social services as defined in
§
63.2-100" for "as defined in

§

63.1-87" in subsection B.

§ 20-88.02:1. Limitations on spousal support orders resulting in eligibility for medical assistance services; definitions.

Whenever any court shall determine that any petition for a spousal support order will have the effect of rendering either spouse eligible for medical assistance services or for accelerating eligibility for medical assistance services, and the community spouse is asking for additional resources which will bring his total resources to an amount in excess of the federally established maximum spousal resource allowance:

The court shall not enter the requested spousal support order unless the court first orders the institutionalized spouse to make available the maximum income contribution to the community spouse.

The court must ascertain, when determining additional income in excess of the federally established community spouse minimum monthly maintenance needs allowance, that the increase is necessary due to exceptional circumstances resulting in significant financial duress to the community spouse.

When determining the amount of any additional resources to be allowed to raise the community spouse's income up to either the federally established community spouse minimum monthly maintenance needs allowance or in excess of such minimum monthly maintenance needs allowance, the amount of such additional resources to be allowed shall be the greater of (i) those additional resources necessary to generate an amount sufficient to increase the community spouse's income to the applicable monthly needs or income allowance, as the case may be when based on the current earnings of such resources or (ii) the amount necessary, at the time of the court's deliberations, to purchase a single premium annuity that would generate monthly income to the community spouse in an amount sufficient to increase the community spouse's income to the applicable monthly needs or income allowance, as the case may be.

For the purpose of making the determinations required by this section:

"Community spouse"
means the spouse of an individual residing in a medical institution or nursing facility.

"Federally established maximum spousal resource allowance"
means that amount established as the maximum spousal resource allowance in 42 U.S.C. 1396r-5 (f) (2) (A) as adjusted annually in accordance with 42 U.S.C. 1396r-5 (g).

"Institutionalized spouse"
means an individual who has been residing in a medical institution or nursing facility for at least thirty consecutive days and who is married to an individual who is not residing in a medical institution or nursing facility.

"Significant financial duress"
means, but is not limited to, threatened loss of basic shelter, food or medically necessary health care or the financial burden of caring for a disabled child, sibling or other immediate relative.

(1994, cc. 836, 952.)

Editor's note.

- Acts 1994, cc. 836 and 952, cl. 2, provide: "That effective January 1, 1994, the federally established maximum spousal resource allowance became $72,660."